Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 111. new text end new text begin Hortman Memorial Highway. new text end new text begin Marked Trunk Highway 610 is designated as "Hortman Memorial Highway." Notwithstanding section 161.139, the commissioner must adopt a suitable design to mark this highway and erect appropriate signs. Each sign that identifies the trunk highway, including but not limited to route and guide signs, must specify the designated name under this subdivision instead of or in addition to the highway number. new text end